Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2220
Oaths and affirmations.

Whenever an oath is required by this code, the affirmation of a person conscientiously scrupulous of taking an oath, shall have the same effect.

R.S.1867, Code § 894, p. 549;

R.S.1913, § 8569;

C.S.1922, § 9520;

C.S.1929, § 20-2221;

R.S.1943, § 25-2220.

It is not contempt of court to decline to be sworn by taking the usual oath, since the witness has the right to affirm. Wilcox v. State, 46 Neb. 402, 64 N.W. 1072 (1895).